Massachusetts, session 194th, H2848.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 26 of chapter 32 of the General
Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following
sentence:- This subdivision shall not apply to a member in service who is not able to perform the
essential duties of the member’s job by reason of violent act injury, as defined in section 7.
SECTION 2. Said section 26 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after subdivision (2) the following subdivision:-
(2½) Section 7 shall apply to any member in service classified in Group 3 who is an
officer of the department of state police if the rating board, after an examination of such officer
by a registered physician appointed by it, reports in writing to the state board of retirement that
such officer is incapacitated for the performance of duty by reason of violent act injury, as
defined in said section 7, occurring during the performance and within the scope of their duty
of 2

and without contributory negligence on their part, and that such incapacity is likely to be
permanent.
of 2